Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-415
Official list of publications; publish; contents.

The Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse shall publish and distribute regularly to contracting depository libraries, other libraries, state agencies and legislators, an official list of state publications with an annual cumulation. The official list shall provide a record of each agency's publishing and show author, agency, title and subject approaches.

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 5.